Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1614
Program; applicability of law.

Any group insurance provided by sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 44, article 16, except that if any provision of sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 is in conflict therewith, the provisions of sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 shall govern.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1631.